Missouri, session 2026, HB3300.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.311, to read as follows:
67.311. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "County", any county with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer
than eight hundred thousand inhabitants;
(2) "Mobile food unit", a vehicle-mounted food service establishment, designed
to be readily movable, that returns to a commissary daily for clean-up and service;
(3) "Municipality", any city, town, or village located wholly or partially within a
county.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any license or permit
issued by a county to a mobile food unit or operator shall be sufficient to allow such
mobile food unit or operator to operate in all municipalities within such county. Any
permitting requirement imposed by a municipality that is more strict than the
permitting requirements imposed by a county shall be null and void.
3. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit or limit any
health or food sanitation regulations authorized in chapter 196 or any other provision of
law.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.